Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.205.050

Rules.

In accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, the Washington professional educator standards board with respect to the matter of certification, and the superintendent of public instruction with respect to all other matters, shall have the power and duty to make the necessary rules to carry out the purpose and intent of this chapter.

[ 2005 c 497 s 215; 1995 c 335 s 201; 1993 c 211 s 4; 1990 c 33 s 184; 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.97.050.]

NOTES:

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 341: See note following RCW 28A.205.010.